Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.080

Prohibited activities.

A person, firm, corporation, business, union, or other organization shall not:

(1) Prevent or interfere with a contractor's or subcontractor's compliance with this chapter, or any rule adopted under this chapter;

(2) Submit false or fraudulent information to the state concerning compliance with this chapter or any such rule;

(3) Fraudulently obtain, retain, attempt to obtain or retain, or aid another in fraudulently obtaining or retaining or attempting to obtain or retain certification as a minority or women's business enterprise for the purpose of this chapter;

(4) Knowingly make a false statement, whether by affidavit, verified statement, report, or other representation, to a state official or employee for the purpose of influencing the certification or denial of certification of any entity as a minority or women's business enterprise;

(5) Knowingly obstruct, impede, or attempt to obstruct or impede any state official or employee who is investigating the qualification of a business entity that has requested certification as a minority or women's business enterprise;

(6) Fraudulently obtain, attempt to obtain, or aid another person in fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain public moneys to which the person is not entitled under this chapter; or

(7) Knowingly make false statements that any entity is or is not certified as a minority or women's business enterprise for purposes of obtaining a contract governed by this chapter.

[ 2021 c 160 s 3; 1987 c 328 s 5; 1983 c 120 s 8.]